Illinois, session 104th, SB542.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois State Collection Act of 1986 is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 210/1)  (from Ch. 15, par. 151)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois State Collection Act of 1986".9(Source: P.A. 84-1344.)